Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 9 Miscellaneous Provisions

47-2-330.
Application of other state funded pension or retirement programs to members or beneficiaries, their surviving spouses, or dependents.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, no program of pensions or retirement benefits for employees, their surviving spouses, or dependents, which program is funded wholly or partially by the state, shall apply to members or beneficiaries of this retirement system, their surviving spouses, or dependents.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 12; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1447, § 2.

47-2-331.
Reporting of employee contributions for federal and state income tax purposes.

Any other provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding, all employee contributions toward retirement allowances, social security benefits, and group term life insurance shall be included in each employee’s gross income reported for federal and state income tax purposes. This Code section shall not pertain to employer contributions or to employee contributions made by employers on behalf of employees.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 546, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 925, § 4.

47-2-332.
Exemption of rights and benefits from taxes, legal process, and assignment of retirement system property as public property; exemptions for retirement system property.

The right to a pension, annuity, retirement allowance, return of contributions, the pension, annuity, or retirement allowance itself, any optional benefit, or any other right accrued or accruing to any person under this chapter and the moneys in the various accounts created by this chapter are:

Exempt from any state, county, or municipal tax, except as provided in Code Section 48-7-27;

Exempt from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever; and

Not assignable except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter.

The tangible, intangible, real, personal, or mixed property, investments, or assets of the retirement system of whatever kind or nature and the earnings or proceeds derived from such property, investments, or assets are public property and are:

Exempt from taxation by the state or by any county, municipality, authority, or political subdivision of this state; and

Exempt from levy and sale, garnishment, attachment, or any other process whatsoever.

The transfer or sale of tangible, real, personal, or mixed property, investments, or assets to or from the retirement system and the instruments of such transfer or sale shall be exempt from any tax on such sales, transfers, or instruments, which tax is levied by the state or by any county, authority, municipality, or political subdivision of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 9; Ga. L. 1976, p. 611, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1449, § 2.

47-2-333.
Attempts to defraud the retirement system by false statements or falsified records; adjustments of erroneous payments.

Any person who shall knowingly make any false statements or shall falsify or permit to be falsified any records of the retirement system in an attempt to defraud the system shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding $500.00, imprisonment not exceeding 12 months, or both.

If any change or error in the records of the retirement system results in any member or beneficiary receiving from it more or less than he would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, the board of trustees shall have the power to correct such error and to adjust the payments as far as practicable and in such manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which such member or beneficiary was correctly entitled shall be paid.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 138, § 10.

47-2-334.
Service retirement allowance; calculation; employee membership contributions; employer contributions; optional membership; conditions; construction of provision.

Except where indicated clearly to the contrary by the context, the word “member” as used in this Code section shall mean any employee who first or again becomes a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia on or after July 1, 1982. From and after July 1, 1982, every person first or again becoming an employee entitled to a new membership in the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia shall become a member subject to this Code section.

Every member subject to this Code section shall, upon becoming eligible under the provisions of this chapter, be entitled to a service retirement allowance, which shall consist of:

An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the member’s accumulated contributions at the time of retirement; and

A monthly pension which, together with the annuity, shall provide a total retirement allowance equal to more than 1.5 percent, but not greater than 2 percent, the actual percent to be set by the board of trustees in direct relation to the amount of increased appropriations provided by the General Assembly to fund the provisions of this paragraph, of the member’s highest average monthly earnable compensation during a period of 24 consecutive calendar months while a member of the retirement system, multiplied by the number of the member’s years of creditable service.

For members subject to this Code section, the calculation of retirement benefits or allowances for any other form or type of retirement shall also be based upon the calculations provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

From and after July 1, 1990, every member subject to this Code section shall contribute employee membership contributions in an amount not less than 1 percent nor greater than 1 1/2 percent of earnable compensation, which shall be deducted by each employer from the earnable compensation of each member for each and every payroll period and paid monthly to the board of trustees; provided, however, that any reduction in such percentage shall be based upon the recommendation of the actuary of the board of trustees, the maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board, and such other factors as the board deems relevant. Of the percentage deducted from the earnable compensation of members, one-fourth of 1 percent shall be credited to the group term life insurance fund in lieu of any other deduction therefor, as provided in Code Section 47-19-10, and the remaining portion shall be credited to the individual accounts of the members in the annuity savings fund. In the event a member is not covered by group term life insurance, the entire amount deducted from the member’s earnable compensation shall be credited to the member’s individual account in the annuity savings fund.

From and after July 1, 1982, each employer shall pay monthly to the board of trustees, on behalf and to the credit of each member subject to this Code section, employer contributions in an amount equal to the aggregate amount of employer contributions plus employee contributions made by the employer as required by this chapter for and on behalf of persons within the membership of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia who are not subject to this Code section. With respect to members subject to this Code section, none of these employer contributions shall be considered as accumulated contributions of the member and none shall be eligible for withdrawal by the member upon cessation of state service.

Membership under this Code section shall be optional for any persons who are within the membership of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia on June 30, 1982. Any such persons may elect in writing on a form to be provided by the board of trustees to become a member subject to this Code section at any time on or after July 1, 1982. This written election shall be final and cannot be later changed or rescinded. Upon such election, a member shall be subject to all the provisions, terms, and conditions of this Code section; provided, however, that the calculation to determine retirement allowances for any person exercising such option shall be made as follows:

The retirement allowance shall be computed fully as if all creditable service of the member were acquired and calculated under the provisions of this Code section;

Then the retirement allowance shall also be computed fully as if all creditable service of the member were acquired and calculated under the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the board of trustees contained other than in this Code section;

Then, a benefit amount shall be determined based upon a fractional part of each retirement allowance computed in steps (1) and (2), which fractional part shall be computed by using the actual years of creditable service established under either this Code section, for step (1), or the provisions of this chapter contained other than in this Code section, for step (2), which number of years shall be the numerator of the fraction, over the total actual years of creditable service established under both this Code section and the provisions of this chapter contained other than in this Code section, which number shall be the denominator of the fraction;

The two benefit amounts so determined shall then be added together to produce the actual retirement allowance; and

If a member is otherwise eligible for projected years in service and unless same is made inapplicable by the conditions in subsection (f) of this Code section, projected years of service used in the determination of retirement benefits for death, disability, involuntary separation, or retirement with 34 years of service shall be used in the computation of the retirement allowances under the foregoing steps (1) and (2). However, projected years of service used in such benefits computations shall not be used in determining the fractional part or allocation of the benefit amount described in foregoing step (3).

Members subject to this Code section shall be subject to the following conditions:

The provisions of subsection (d) of Code Section 47-2-120 shall not be applicable to members subject to this Code section;

Except as otherwise provided in Code Sections 47-2-204, 47-2-225, and 47-2-266, and in paragraph (3) of this subsection and except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, no service shall constitute creditable service except membership service for which the full rate of employee membership contributions and employer contributions is made pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section; and

The provisions of Code Section 47-2-91 shall be applicable to members subject to this Code section; provided, however, that such benefits shall be subject to reduction or repeal by subsequent legislation and shall not be considered an element of any contract of employment.

All members subject to this Code section shall have and be subject to all other rights, privileges, obligations, and duties specified by other provisions of this chapter, and all such other provisions shall be of full force and effect with respect to any matter not specifically provided for in this Code section.

This Code section shall not be construed and is not intended so as to have any effect whatsoever on persons within the membership of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia on June 30, 1982, who do not elect in writing to become members subject to this Code section.

The provisions of this Code section shall control over conflicting or inconsistent provisions of this chapter or any other law of this state. It is the intention of the General Assembly that this Code section has not been and may not be repealed, superseded, or modified by implication through the enactment of any other law or through the amendment of any other provision of this chapter or any other existing law, and any modification or repeal of any provision of this Code section may be accomplished only by reference or amendment to or repeal of this specific Code section.

The board of trustees shall cause the actuary for the retirement system to calculate the actuarial cost to the retirement system of any salary increase granted to a member in excess of 5 percent over the 12 months immediately prior to such member’s retirement date and shall notify the employing unit of such amount. Such notice shall be sent not later than 60 days following such member’s retirement date. The employing unit shall pay such amount, together with the cost of such actuarial calculation, as a supplemental employer contribution to the board of trustees not later than the last day of the month following receipt of such notice.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 1163, § 2; Code 1981, §

47-2-334

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1163, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 30, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1233, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 356, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 532, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1151, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 638, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 722, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 730, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 174, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1104, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1239, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1506, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1288, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 365, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 176, § 2/HB 448; Ga. L. 2009, p. 322, § 4/HB 476; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 38/SB 436.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added subsection (j).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, near the beginning of paragraph (f)(2), deleted “in subsection (j) of Code Section 47-2-96,” following “provided” and deleted “47-2-96.1, 47-2-96.2,” preceding “47-2-204”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 589, amending paragraph (f)(2)
of this Code section, was not concurrently funded as required by Code Section 47-20-50 and, therefore, did not become law and became repealed on July 1, 1990. See the state auditor’s report at Ga. L. 1990, p. CCCV.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”